hr-HR: Format kompleta modela rakete: Gotovo spremno za let (ARF); Spremno za let (RTF); Komplet za 1. razinu vještine; Komplet za 2. razinu vještine; Komplet za 3. razinu vještine; Komplet za 4. razinu vještine; Komplet za 5. razinu vještine; Ostalo
nl: Soort modelraketkit: Almost-ready-to-fly (ARF); Ready-to-fly (RTF); Kit vaardigheidsniveau 1; Kit vaardigheidsniveau 2; Kit vaardigheidsniveau 3; Kit vaardigheidsniveau 4; Kit vaardigheidsniveau 5; Overig
ro-RO: Format al kitului pentru rachetomodelism: Aproape gata de zbor (ARF); Gata de zbor (RTF); Kit de nivel de dificultate 1; Kit de nivel de dificultate 2; Kit de nivel de dificultate 3; Kit de nivel de dificultate 4; Kit de nivel de dificultate 5; Altele
bg-BG: Формат на комплекта за моделна ракета: Почти готов за полет (ARF); Готов за полет (RTF); Комплект за ниво на умения 1; Комплект за ниво на умения 2; Комплект за ниво на умения 3; Комплект за ниво на умения 4; Комплект за ниво на умения 5; Друго
it: Formato del kit del razzo modello: Quasi pronto al volo (ARF); Pronto al volo (RTF); Kit livello di abilità 1; Kit livello di abilità 2; Kit livello di abilità 3; Kit livello di abilità 4; Kit livello di abilità 5; Altro
de: Format des Modellraketen-Sets: Fast flugfertig (ARF); Ready-to-fly (RTF); Level-1-Paket; Level-2-Paket; Level-3-Paket; Level-4-Paket; Level-5-Paket; Sonstige
ko: 모델 로켓 키트 형태: 반조립식(ARF); 완제품(RTF); 스킬 레벨 1 키트; 스킬 레벨 2 키트; 스킬 레벨 3 키트; 스킬 레벨 4 키트; 스킬 레벨 5 키트; 기타
zh-CN: 模型火箭套件形式: 几乎可直接飞行（ARF）; 随时可飞（RTF）; 技能等级 1 套件; 技能等级 2 套件; 技能等级 3 套件; 技能等级 4 套件; 技能等级 5 套件; 其他
da: Modelrakettens sætformat: Almost-ready-to-fly (ARF); Ready-to-fly (RTF); Sæt til færdighedsniveau 1; Sæt til færdighedsniveau 2; Sæt til færdighedsniveau 3; Sæt til færdighedsniveau 4; Sæt til færdighedsniveau 5; Andet
el: Μορφή κιτ μοντέλου πυραύλου: Σχεδόν έτοιμο για πτήση (ARF); Έτοιμο για πτήση (RTF); Κιτ επιπέδου δυσκολίας 1; Κιτ επιπέδου δυσκολίας 2; Κιτ επιπέδου δυσκολίας 3; Κιτ επιπέδου δυσκολίας 4; Κιτ επιπέδου δυσκολίας 5; Άλλο
tr: Model roket kit formatı: Uçuşa neredeyse hazır (ARF); Uçuşa hazır (RTF); Beceri seviyesi 1 kit; Beceri seviyesi 2 kit; Beceri seviyesi 3 kit; Beceri seviyesi 4 kit; Beceri seviyesi 5 kit; Diğer
sk-SK: Formát súpravy hračkárskej rakety: Takmer pripravené na let (ARF); Pripravené na let (RTF); Súprava pre úroveň zručnosti 1; Súprava pre úroveň zručnosti 2; Súprava pre úroveň zručnosti 3; Súprava pre úroveň zručnosti 4; Súprava pre úroveň zručnosti 5; Iné
ja: モデルロケットキットフォーマット: 飛行ほぼ準備完了 (ARF); 飛行準備完了 (RTF); スキルレベル1キット; スキルレベル2キット; スキルレベル3キット; スキルレベル4キット; スキルレベル5キット; その他
sl-SI: Format kompleta modelarske rakete: Skoraj pripravljeno za letenje (ARF); Pripravljeno za letenje (RTF); Komplet 1. stopnje spretnosti; Komplet 2. stopnje spretnosti; Komplet 3. stopnje spretnosti; Komplet 4. stopnje spretnosti; Komplet 5. stopnje spretnosti; Drugo
ru: Формат набора модели ракеты: Почти готов к полету (ARF); Готов к полету (RTF); Набор 1 уровня сложности; Набор 2 уровня сложности; Набор 3 уровня сложности; Набор 4 уровня сложности; Набор 5 уровня сложности; Другое
pt-PT: Formato do kit de foguete modelo: Quase pronto a voar (ARF); Pronto a voar (RTF); Kit de nível de dificuldade 1; Kit de nível de dificuldade 2; Kit de nível de dificuldade 3; Kit de nível de dificuldade 4; Kit de nível de dificuldade 5; Outro
pt-BR: Formato do kit de foguete de modelismo: Quase pronto para voar (ARF); Pronto para voar (RTF); Kit nível de habilidade 1; Kit nível de habilidade 2; Kit nível de habilidade 3; Kit nível de habilidade 4; Kit nível de habilidade 5; Outro
hu: Modellrakéta készlet formátuma: Repülésre majdnem kész (ARF); Repülésre kész (RTF); 1. szintű készlet; 2. szintű készlet; 3. szintű készlet; 4. szintű készlet; 5. szintű készlet; Egyéb
nb: Format for modellrakettsett: Nesten flyklar (ARF); Flyklar (RTF); Sett for ferdighetsnivå 1; Sett for ferdighetsnivå 2; Sett for ferdighetsnivå 3; Sett for ferdighetsnivå 4; Sett for ferdighetsnivå 5; Annet
fr: Format de kit de fusée miniature: Presque prêt à voler (ARF); Prêt à voler (RTF); Kit de niveau 1; Kit de niveau 2; Kit de niveau 3; Kit de niveau 4; Kit de niveau 5; Autre
zh-TW: 模型火箭套件格式: 半完成機 (ARF); 到手即飛 (RTF); 技能等級 1 套件; 技能等級 2 套件; 技能等級 3 套件; 技能等級 4 套件; 技能等級 5 套件; 其他
cs: Formát stavebnice modelové rakety: Téměř připraveno k letu (ARF); Připraveno k letu (RTF); Stavebnice pro úroveň 1; Stavebnice pro úroveň 2; Stavebnice pro úroveň 3; Stavebnice pro úroveň 4; Stavebnice pro úroveň 5; Jiné
lt-LT: Modelinės raketos rinkinio formatas: Beveik paruoštas skristi (ARF); Paruoštas skristi (RTF); 1 įgūdžių lygio rinkinys; 2 įgūdžių lygio rinkinys; 3 įgūdžių lygio rinkinys; 4 įgūdžių lygio rinkinys; 5 įgūdžių lygio rinkinys; Kita
sv: Utförande av Modellraketsats: Nästan flygklar (ARF); Flygklar (RTF); Byggsats för svårighetsgrad 1; Byggsats för svårighetsgrad 2; Byggsats för svårighetsgrad 3; Byggsats för svårighetsgrad 4; Byggsats för svårighetsgrad 5; Annat
es: Formato del kit de cohete de modelismo: Casi listo para volar (ARF); Listo para volar (RTF); Kit de nivel de habilidad 1; Kit de nivel de habilidad 2; Kit de nivel de habilidad 3; Kit de nivel de habilidad 4; Kit de nivel de habilidad 5; Otro
th: รูปแบบชุดประกอบจรวดจำลอง: เกือบพร้อมบิน (ARF); พร้อมบิน (RTF); ชุดประกอบทักษะระดับ 1; ชุดประกอบทักษะระดับ 2; ชุดประกอบทักษะระดับ 3; ชุดประกอบทักษะระดับ 4; ชุดประกอบทักษะระดับ 5; อื่นๆ
pl: Format zestawu modelu rakiety: Prawie gotowa do lotu (ARF); Gotowa do lotu (RTF); Zestaw: poziom trudności 1; Zestaw: poziom trudności 2; Zestaw: poziom trudności 3; Zestaw: poziom trudności 4; Zestaw: poziom trudności 5; Inny
vi: Định dạng bộ mô hình tên lửa: Gần như sẵn sàng bay (ARF); Sẵn sàng bay (RTF); Bộ lắp ráp cấp độ kỹ năng 1; Bộ lắp ráp cấp độ kỹ năng 2; Bộ lắp ráp cấp độ kỹ năng 3; Bộ lắp ráp cấp độ kỹ năng 4; Bộ lắp ráp cấp độ kỹ năng 5; Khác
en: Model rocket kit format: Almost-ready-to-fly (ARF); Ready-to-fly (RTF); Skill level 1 kit; Skill level 2 kit; Skill level 3 kit; Skill level 4 kit; Skill level 5 kit; Other
fi: Mallirakettipakkauksen muoto: Melkein lentovalmis (ARF); Lentovalmis (RTF); Taitotason 1 sarja; Taitotason 2 sarja; Taitotason 3 sarja; Taitotason 4 sarja; Taitotason 5 sarja; Muu